apertium-asm.asm.dix
    <pardef n="আহ_vblex">
      <e><p><l>োঁ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ওঁ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>োঁ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ওঁ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ই<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ই<b/>আছো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ালো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'লো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'লো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ালো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'লো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'লো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈ<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছিলো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈ<b/>আছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছিলো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ইছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ইছিলো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ইছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈছিলো</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ইছিলো</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>াম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>াম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ম</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ই<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছ</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ই<b/>আছ</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছ</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prescont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ালি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'লি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'লি</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ালি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'লি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'লি</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈ<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছিলি</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ি<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ই<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈ<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ই<b/>আছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ই<b/>আছিলি</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pastcont"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ইছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৈছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'ইছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ইছিলি</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িছিলি</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="আহ"><i>আহ</i><par n="আহ_vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="গা"><i>গা</i><par n="আহ_vblex"/></e>
